Mississippi, session 2026, HB998.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  This section shall be codified as Section 45-33-50, Mississippi Code of 1972, as follows: 45-33-50.  (1)  A person convicted of a sex offense who owns or manages a business that provides services to the public shall post a clear and visible sign on the outside of the business in a location that can be seen by any person upon entering the business.  All wording on the sign shall be a minimum of eighteen (18) inches font height and bold. (2)  This section applies to all registered sex offenders regardless of the date of conviction. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.